Washington statutes.
RCW 43.82.055

Long-term facility needs—Six-year facility plan—Efficient use of state facilities.

The office of financial management shall:

(1) Work with the department of enterprise services and all other state agencies to determine the long-term facility needs of state government;

(2) Develop and submit a six-year facility plan to the legislature by January 1st of every odd-numbered year that includes state agency space requirements and other pertinent data necessary for cost-effective facility planning. The department of enterprise services shall assist with this effort as required by the office of financial management; and

(3) Establish and enforce policies and workplace strategies that promote the efficient use of state facilities.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 301; 2015 c 225 s 76; 2007 c 506 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2007 c 506: See note following RCW 43.82.035.